Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 4. Regulation of Telecommunications Services Generally

§ 37-15-401.
Commission powers.

In addition to the powers exercised pursuant to the provisions of W.S.

37-15-408

, the commission has the power to:

Investigate the methods and practices of any telecommunications company;

Require any telecommunications company to conform to the laws of this state and to all rules, regulations and orders of the commission not contrary to law;

Make any rules and regulations, in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, necessary for the commission to carry out its powers in this chapter, including rules objectively established and consistent with commonly accepted industry standards, where applicable standards exist;

Require reports and studies as to prices and terms and conditions of service, necessary and relevant for the commission’s exercise of its authority, including those protected as trade secret or confidential based on legitimate competitive or other operational concerns;

Hold hearings on complaints, or for good cause, upon notice and subject to the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act;

Regulate telecommunications companies only as provided for in this chapter; and

Exercise authority as expressly delegated under the Federal Communications Act of 1934, as amended.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 181, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 37-14-401; 2007, ch. 142, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (a)(vii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

No authority to construe federal law. —

The public service commission lacked the authority to determine that a telecommunications company's proposed discontinuance and grandfathering of optional business services violated the Federal Telecommunications Act, 47 USCS § 151 et seq. U S West Communs. v. Wyoming PSC, 988 P.2d 1061,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. 1999), modified, 15 P.3d 722,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 228

(Wyo. 2000).

Quoted

in

US West Communs. v. Wyoming PSC, 992 P.2d 1092,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1999).

§ 37-15-402.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 142, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1995, ch. 181, § 1, pertained to cost based pricing, prohibition of cross-subsidies, and enforcement.

Laws 2007, ch. 142, § 3 makes the act effective July 1, 2007.

§ 37-15-403.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 142, § 2.

§ 37-15-404.
Protection of telecommunications consumers.

No telecommunications company shall unreasonably discriminate as to customers in prices, terms or conditions of service, or in connection to or with other telecommunications companies. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit any telecommunications company from:

Providing volume or other price discounts based on reasonable, nonpredatory business practices;

Passing through any state, municipal or local taxes to the customers in the area where the tax is levied; or

Furnishing free or reduced price service to its current or pensioned employees and dependent members of their families, as defined in the applicable price schedules on file with the commission.

The commission shall not give unreasonably discriminatory or preferential treatment in its regulation of any telecommunications company.

A telecommunications company providing a noncompetitive telecommunications service shall not discontinue providing the service without the commission’s approval.

A telecommunications company shall not:

Fail to disclose in a timely and uniform manner information necessary for the design of equipment and services that will meet the specifications of interconnection;

Fail or refuse to provide a service or product in accordance with the telecommunications company’s tariffs, price lists or contracts and within the commission’s applicable rules and orders.

The commission may adopt rules and regulations to provide for:

The interconnection of telecommunications companies’ networks at nondiscriminatory and reasonable rates, terms and conditions;

The effective and efficient interoperability of telecommunications companies’ networks;

The unbundling of services into reasonable basic network features;

The administration and allocation of phone numbers to the extent technically and economically feasible;

Telephone number portability to the full extent technically feasible; and

The resale and sharing of services and functions at reasonable and nondiscriminatory rates.

No telecommunications company shall engage in anti-competitive behavior, including, but not limited to, discrimination in favor of its affiliates.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 181, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 37-14-404; 2007, ch. 142, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (f).

Protection not required. —

Public service commission's approval of discontinuance of telecommunications services is required only when there is a discontinuance of “noncompetitive service” as defined by § 37-15-103(a)(ix). U S West Communs. v. Wyoming PSC, 988 P.2d 1061,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. 1999), modified, 15 P.3d 722,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 228

(Wyo. 2000).

Non-essential telecommunications service not subject to regulation. —

Optional business service allowing a customer using a number of telephone lines to include the lines in a single-switched system at volume discount rates, which was not necessary for the connection between the end user's premises and the local network switching facility, was not an essential telecommunications service under §

37-15-103

, and thus not subject to regulation as a noncompetitive service. U S West Communs. v. Wyoming PSC, 988 P.2d 1061,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. 1999), modified, 15 P.3d 722,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 228

(Wyo. 2000).

A telecommunications company's plan to grandfather an optional service, which allows a customer using a number of telephone lines to include the lines in a single-switched system, to existing customers while not offering the service to new customers was not unreasonably discriminatory. U S West Communs. v. PSC, 15 P.3d 722,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 228

(Wyo. 2000).

Stated

in

US West Communs. v. Wyoming PSC, 992 P.2d 1092,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1999).

§ 37-15-405.
Complaint against prices.

Any person, and the commission on its own motion, may complain to the commission concerning the reasonableness of the price of any noncompetitive telecommunications service or any violation of W.S.

37-15-404

. Any notice and hearing of any complaint shall be in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act and this chapter. The commission shall only set aside any price it finds after notice and hearing to be unreasonable or unreasonably discriminatory. If the commission sets aside a price as unreasonable or unreasonably discriminatory, the telecommunications company shall have sixty (60) days to file a new price which is reasonable. The company shall refund any charges found to be unreasonable as ordered by the commission. Rates or prices for noncompetitive essential services in effect as of July 1, 2006, are deemed to be fair and reasonable.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 181, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 37-14-405; 2007, ch. 142, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, inserted “or any violation of W.S.

37-15-404

” at the end of the first sentence and rewrote the last sentence.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Quoted

in

US West Communs. v. Wyoming PSC, 992 P.2d 1092,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1999); Tri County Tel. Ass'n v. Wyoming Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 11 P.3d 938,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 201

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 37-15-406.
Quality of service.

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 142, § 2.

Any customer, and the commission on its own motion, may complain concerning the quality of service provided by a telecommunications company. A complaint shall be noticed and heard as provided for in the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. The commission, after notice and hearing, may direct the telecommunications company to take whatever remedial action is technically feasible and economically reasonable to provide reasonably adequate service. The commission shall authorize a telecommunications provider to recover the cost of compliance as reasonably determined by any commission order under this section.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 181, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 37-14-406; 2007, ch. 142, §§ 1, 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, repealed (a), which read: “Each telecommunications company shall perform a study to determine the reasonable measures of customer service satisfaction and service adequacy for all classifications of noncompetitive and competitive telecommunications services and, no later than September 1, 1995, submit to the commission its proposed service quality standards for those services. These proposals shall be considered in any rulemaking on quality undertaken by the commission pursuant to W.S. 37-15-401(a)(iii).”; and in (b) substituted “as reasonably determined by” for “with” following “the cost of compliance.”

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 37-15-407.
Annual report.

The commission shall with the input and participation of the telecommunications industry and other relevant state departments, boards and agencies prepare and issue an annual report on the status of the telecommunications industry. The report shall be based on information provided to the commission and shall include:

through (iv) Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 142, § 2.

Any recommendations for legislative change which are adopted by the commission and which the commission believes are in the interest of Wyoming telecommunications customers; and

Any other information or analysis which the commission is required to provide by this title or deems necessary to provide.

The commission’s report shall be filed with the legislature and the governor.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 181, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 37-14-407; 2007, ch. 142, §§ 1, 2; 2012, ch. 30, § 3.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in the introductory language of (a) substituted “The” for “and Wyoming regulation thereof on January 10 of each year beginning in 1996. Such” following “status of the telecommunications industry” and inserted “be based on information provided to the commission and shall” following “report shall”, and repealed (i) through (iv), which read: “(i) A review of regulatory decisions and actions from the preceding year and a description of pending cases involving significant telecommunications companies or issues; (ii) A description of the telecommunications industry or trends therein, including the number, type and size of companies offering telecommunications services, telecommunications technologies in place and under development, variations in the geographic availability of services and in process for services, and penetration levels of subscriber access to local exchange service in each exchange and trends related thereto; (iii) The status of compliance by carriers and the commission with the requirements of this chapter; (iv) The effects, and likely effects of Wyoming regulatory policies and practices, including those described in this title, on telecommunications companies, services and customers.’’

The 2012 amendment,

deleted “and the state telecommunications council” at the end of (b), and made related changes.

Laws 2012, ch. 30, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

§ 37-15-408.
Applicability of existing law.

W.S.

37-2-102

,

37-2-104

,

37-2-106

through

37-2-109

,

37-2-113

,

37-2-115

through

37-2-118

,

37-2-124

,

37-2-125

,

37-2-130

,

37-2-203

, 37-2-205(a),

37-2-209

,

37-2-214

through

37-2-216

,

37-2-218

,

37-3-114

,

37-4-101

through

37-4-104

,

37-12-120

through

37-12-130

,

37-12-201

,

37-12-202

,

37-12-204

through

37-12-213

,

37-12-301

through

37-12-304

and

37-13-101

through

37-13-137

, inclusive, unless in conflict with other provisions of this chapter, are applicable to telecommunications companies and telecommunication companies shall be considered public utilities for the purposes of those provisions.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 181, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 37-14-408; 2007, ch. 142, § 1; 2015 ch. 54, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, deleted “37-1-104 through

37-1-106

” preceding “37-2-102”, deleted “37-12-209,

37-12-211

through” following “37-12-204 through” and deleted the former final sentence, which read: “For purposes of this chapter W.S. 37 3 106(b) and (c) shall apply to telecommunications companies which are rate of return regulated.”

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, deleted “37-2-301 through

37-2-306

” following “37-2-214 through

37-2-216

,

37-2-218

” and made a related change.

Quoted

in

RT Communs., Inc. v. PSC, 2003 WY 145, 79 P.3d 36,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 2003).

§ 37-15-409.
Construction with other laws.

If the provisions of this chapter conflict with any other statutes, the provisions of this chapter shall control.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 181, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 37-14-409.

§ 37-15-410.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 142, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1995, ch. 181, § 1, pertained to dialing arrangements and access charge review.

Laws 2007, ch. 142, §
3 makes the act effective July 1, 2007.

§ 37-15-411.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 142, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1995, ch. 181, § 1, related to access charge review.

Laws 2007, ch. 142, §
3 makes the act effective July 1, 2007.

§ 37-15-412.
Unauthorized change of telecommunications company; unauthorized services; prohibited practices; penalties.

No person shall engage in any practice which has the effect of changing any Wyoming consumer’s telecommunications company if the change is willfully made without the knowledge and consent of that consumer. No person shall willfully charge or attempt to collect charges from any Wyoming consumer for any product or service not provided to the consumer or not authorized by the consumer. The public service commission shall provide upon request of a Wyoming consumer, information or technical assistance regarding appropriate action for the consumer to take in order not to receive telecommunication companies solicitations.

Any change in a Wyoming consumer’s telecommunications company shall be effective only if it is in compliance with any method of authorization permitted under federal law, rule or regulation, except that no negative option marketing technique shall be permitted to be used.

If the chosen method is a letter of agency it shall be maintained by the new service provider. No letter of agency under subsection (b) of this section shall be effective if it is physically attached to or part of any inducement, premium, coupon or other promotional material. No letter of agency shall be effective until it is in the actual possession of the new service provider.

Any consumer whose telecommunications company has been willfully changed in violation of subsection (a) of this section is not liable for payment of any unauthorized charge unless the commission determines, after conducting a public hearing on any complaint brought on the matter, that the consumer engaged in any fraudulent or deceptive practice which avoids payment for telecommunications services in connection with the unauthorized charge.

A consumer is not liable for an amount charged for any unauthorized product provided or service initiated by a telecommunications company or its billing agent without the consent of the consumer. No consumer shall be liable to pay for any product not delivered or service not furnished.

Restitution for violation of this section shall be as follows:

The unauthorized telecommunications company shall pay all recurring and nonrecurring fees and charges necessary for the consumer to promptly reinstate service from the original telecommunications company and shall pay that company an amount equal to that which would have been due had the consumer remained with the original telecommunications company;

In addition to paragraph (f)(i) of this section, the unauthorized telecommunications company shall pay to any consumer any amount the consumer has paid to the unauthorized company for which the consumer is not liable under subsection (d) of this section.

If the commission shall determine by a preponderance of the evidence in a hearing that any person willfully has engaged in any practice which has the effect of changing any Wyoming consumer’s telecommunications company without complying with the applicable provisions of this section, has charged or attempted to collect a charge for unauthorized service, or has solicited a Wyoming consumer in violation of this section:

The commission may impose for each change or charge made in violation of this section an administrative penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000.00); and

If the commission finds that the person has violated this section with such frequency as to indicate a general business practice it may also permanently revoke the authority of the company involved to provide intrastate interexchange or other telecommunications services in this state.

The following are not subject to the provisions of this section:

Changes in a consumer’s telecommunications company or other services effected through a consolidation or merger of the consumer’s current telecommunications company;

Services and corresponding charges required by law or order of the commission.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 31, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

State regulation of telephone “slamming,” 92 ALR5th 1.

§ 37-15-413.
Limitation on authority of political subdivision to enter exclusive agreement for provision of telecommunications service.

Except as provided in subsections (b) through (d) of this section, before the governing body of any city or town or other political subdivision of this state shall provide for the construction, maintenance or operation of any telecommunications service by entering into an exclusive franchise, partnership, joint venture, contract, resale agreement or any other exclusive agreement with any party regarding telecommunications service, the city, town or other political subdivision shall:

Determine, after notice and opportunity for a public hearing, that no private provider of telecommunications services is currently providing substantially the same or similar service anywhere within the boundaries of the city, town or political subdivision;

Have submitted a written request to all private providers of telecommunications services within the boundaries of the city, town or political subdivision for provision of the same quality and grade of telecommunications service within the same time frame and at the same consumer prices proposed under the exclusive contract;

Determine, after notice and opportunity for a public hearing that the private telecommunications service providers have not agreed within ninety (90) days of the receipt of the request submitted pursuant to paragraph (ii) of this subsection to provide the same quality and grade of service within the same time frame and at the same consumer prices as proposed under the exclusive contract, or if the provider has agreed, that the provider has not commenced providing or constructing facilities to provide the service in the manner agreed upon; and

Limit the term of any exclusive agreement under this section to not more than six (6) years.

The governing body of a city or town or other political subdivision shall allow the nondiscriminatory, nonexclusive and competitively neutral use of its rights-of-way including its poles, conduits, ducts or similar support structures by any telecommunications company and nothing in this section shall be construed to the contrary.

Nothing in this section shall restrict the governing body of a city or town, or other political subdivision, from providing a telecommunications service or facility:

For its own use;

For 911, E-911 or other emergency services;

For medical or educational purposes; or

To students by an educational institution.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict the governing body of a city or town or other political subdivision, from providing a telecommunications service to a party within the geographic area in which the city, town or political subdivision operates as a telecommunications utility. Any city, town or political subdivision providing a telecommunications service under this subsection shall:

Provide the telecommunications service on a nondiscriminatory, nonexclusive and competitively neutral basis; and

Provide the telecommunications service at a price which covers cost, including imputed costs that the city, town or political subdivision would incur if it were a for-profit telecommunications company.

Any person may complain to the commission, and the commission may on its own motion initiate an investigation, concerning any alleged violation of this section by a city, town or political subdivision, subject to the following:

If the commission finds that a city, town or political subdivision has violated this section, or finds that any rule, action or order of a city, town or political subdivision is anticompetitive or otherwise violates this section, the commission shall notify the city, town or political subdivision of the violation. The city, town or political subdivision shall cure the anticompetitive behavior within ninety (90) days following mailing of notice by the commission; and

If the city, town or political subdivision does not cure the anticompetitive behavior within ninety (90) days, the commission shall commence a contested case hearing on the complaint, governed by the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, W.S.

16-3-101

et seq. If, following the hearing, the commission finds that the city, town or political subdivision has violated this section, the commission shall prohibit the city, town or political subdivision from providing any telecommunications service until the violation of this section is remedied.

This section does not apply to any contract entered into prior to July 1, 2007.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 118, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 165, § 3 makes the act effective July 1, 2007.